src/propernoun-nob-lex.txt
LEXICON prop
m1 ;


LEXICON PROP
+N+Prop: K ;

LEXICON PROP-surfem
+N+Prop+Sur: K ;
+N+Prop+Fem: K ;

LEXICON PROP-surmal
+N+Prop+Sur: K ;
+N+Prop+Mal: K ;

LEXICON PROP-malfem
+N+Prop+Mal: K ;
+N+Prop+Fem: K ;

LEXICON PROP-surplc
+N+Prop+Sur: K ;
+N+Prop+Plc: K ;

LEXICON PROP-fem
+N+Prop+Fem: K ;

LEXICON PROP-mal
+N+Prop+Mal: K ;

LEXICON PROP-sur
+N+Prop+Sur: K ;

LEXICON PROP-plc
+N+Prop+Plc: K ;

LEXICON PROP-org
+N+Prop+Org: K ;

LEXICON PROP-ani
+N+Prop+Ani: K ;

LEXICON PROP-obj
+N+Prop+Obj: K ;

LEXICON ProperNoun
Amiga PROP ;
The PROP ;
Li PROP ;
Sarai PROP ;
Ballari PROP ;
Lindbo PROP ;
Kambo PROP ;
Skovbo PROP ;
Nordhuglo PROP ;
Øylo PROP ;
Borkamo PROP ;
Skulstadmo PROP ;
Lillemo PROP ;
Teigmo PROP ;
Krøkmo PROP ;
Kvernmo PROP ;
Alsmo PROP ;
Flatmo PROP ;
Aškenas PROP ;
Hu PROP ;
Ridabu PROP ;
Reu PROP ;
Robru PROP ;
My PROP ;
Saraby PROP ;
Andeby PROP ;
Højreby PROP ;
Veiby PROP ;
Sønderby PROP ;
Sæby PROP ;
Assembly PROP ;
Basilicæ PROP ;
Urbyæ PROP ;
Rø PROP ;
Medbø PROP ;
Indrebø PROP ;
Flatebø PROP ;
Østerbø PROP ;
Midtbø PROP ;
Mandø PROP ;
Fejø PROP ;
Nakksjø PROP ;
Flø PROP ;
Aarø PROP ;
Thurø PROP ;
Hafsø PROP ;
Tissø PROP ;
Hülegü PROP ;
Skårerhøgda PROP-plc ;
Kanchenjunga PROP-plc ;
Čekkia PROP-plc ;
Bosnia PROP-plc ;
Havia PROP-plc ;
Detsika PROP-plc ;
Oravala PROP-plc ;
Scævola PROP-plc ;
Graana PROP-plc ;
Suomenlinna PROP-plc ;
Tampa PROP-plc ;
Hamora PROP-plc ;
Manisa PROP-plc ;
Ojaranta PROP-plc ;
Bringneshalvøya PROP-plc ;
Skaland PROP-plc ;
Sjøstrand PROP-plc ;
Bekkarfjord PROP-plc ;
Grange PROP-plc ;
Randine PROP-plc ;
Dunkerque PROP-plc ;
Olsborg PROP-plc ;
Grangemouth PROP-plc ;
Kumajri PROP-plc ;
Keflavik PROP-plc ;
Finmark PROP-plc ;
Susendal PROP-plc ;
Hudiksvall PROP-plc ;
Anaheim PROP-plc ;
Honan PROP-plc ;
Glorvigen PROP-plc ;
Kvarken PROP-plc ;
Storbekkmoen PROP-plc ;
Port-of-Spain PROP-plc ;
Pitcairn PROP-plc ;
Tiago PROP-plc ;
Agrigento PROP-plc ;
Sandåker PROP-plc ;
Kivikangas PROP-plc ;
Oksnes PROP-plc ;
Dettifoss PROP-plc ;
Hemnesberget PROP-plc ;
Russeluft PROP-plc ;
Poitou PROP-plc ;
Coventry PROP-plc ;
Amerihká PROP-plc ;
Perkiö PROP-plc ;
Pakkala PROP-surplc ;
Nummela PROP-surplc ;
Karhula PROP-surplc ;
Lund PROP-surplc ;
Harkerud PROP-surplc ;
Aanerud PROP-surplc ;
Roterud PROP-surplc ;
Syverud PROP-surplc ;
Hengsrød PROP-surplc ;
Gulborg PROP-surplc ;
Humalajoki PROP-surplc ;
Korpikoski PROP-surplc ;
Korkeamäki PROP-surplc ;
Hietamäki PROP-surplc ;
Kuusimäki PROP-surplc ;
Murtomäki PROP-surplc ;
Heinämäki PROP-surplc ;
Haapaniemi PROP-surplc ;
Huhtiniemi PROP-surplc ;
Hakoniemi PROP-surplc ;
Koivuniemi PROP-surplc ;
Ahvenlampi PROP-surplc ;
Haapsaari PROP-surplc ;
Santalahti PROP-surplc ;
Koivulahti PROP-surplc ;
Haukijärvi PROP-surplc ;
Isojärvi PROP-surplc ;
Novokusneck PROP-surplc ;
Ganddal PROP-surplc ;
Kirkwall PROP-surplc ;
Kaipiainen PROP-surplc ;
Louvain PROP-surplc ;
Cochin PROP-surplc ;
Aarflon PROP-surplc ;
Moldtun PROP-surplc ;
Presttun PROP-surplc ;
Moisio PROP-surplc ;
Bagenkop PROP-surplc ;
Slangerup PROP-surplc ;
Bryrup PROP-surplc ;
Grymyr PROP-surplc ;
Ulnes PROP-surplc ;
Eleusis PROP-surplc ;
Glåmos PROP-surplc ;
Erebus PROP-surplc ;
Lahdensivu PROP-surplc ;
Kivelä PROP-surplc ;
Selkälä PROP-surplc ;
IATA PROP-org ;
AutoCAD PROP-org ;
AOF PROP-org ;
FBI PROP-org ;
TDK PROP-org ;
FORTRAN PROP-org ;
ISO PROP-org ;
NEP PROP-org ;
USSR PROP-org ;
BT PROP-org ;
NTNU PROP-org ;
Ra PROP-org ;
Husqvarna PROP-org ;
Opec PROP-org ;
Limited PROP-org ;
Riksförbund PROP-org ;
Greenpeace PROP-org ;
Masuriske PROP-org ;
Torne PROP-org ;
UniReg PROP-org ;
Milorg PROP-org ;
Kodak PROP-org ;
Network PROP-org ;
Burial PROP-org ;
Council PROP-org ;
Nordmål PROP-org ;
Samemuseum PROP-org ;
Fujian PROP-org ;
Trålerkomiteen PROP-org ;
Handelen PROP-org ;
Unionen PROP-org ;
Høsten PROP-org ;
Distriktsorganisasjon PROP-org ;
Nyco PROP-org ;
Ap PROP-org ;
Elsevier PROP-org ;
Adidas PROP-org ;
Justis PROP-org ;
Føbus PROP-org ;
Sametingsrådet PROP-org ;
Blylaget PROP-org ;
Landbruget PROP-org ;
Luftfartsverket PROP-org ;
Likestillingssenteret PROP-org ;
Microsoft PROP-org ;
Institut PROP-org ;
Univirsity PROP-org ;
Midgardsormen PROP-ani ;
Svarten PROP-ani ;
Fenrisulven PROP-ani ;
Tulokas PROP-ani ;
Eurokas PROP-ani ;
Fenris PROP-ani ;
Foiniks PROP-ani ;
Føniks PROP-ani ;
Kerberos PROP-ani ;
Pegasos PROP-ani ;
Taurus PROP-ani ;
Pegasus PROP-ani ;
Viiru PROP-ani ;
Ketty PROP-ani ;
Levy PROP-ani ;
BMW PROP-obj ;
Omega PROP-obj ;
Suomalaisia PROP-obj ;
Sjustjerna PROP-obj ;
Punta PROP-obj ;
Basic PROP-obj ;
MasterCard PROP-obj ;
BackOffice PROP-obj ;
Dodge PROP-obj ;
Skidbladne PROP-obj ;
Logitech PROP-obj ;
Bugatti PROP-obj ;
Retorikk PROP-obj ;
Landbruk PROP-obj ;
Social PROP-obj ;
Provissional PROP-obj ;
Kommunal PROP-obj ;
Åarjel PROP-obj ;
Codisil PROP-obj ;
Beryl PROP-obj ;
Samnium PROP-obj ;
Kysylkum PROP-obj ;
Oktan PROP-obj ;
Folketellingen PROP-obj ;
Årosskogen PROP-obj ;
Lappecodicillen PROP-obj ;
Norrmännen PROP-obj ;
Nordsjøkonvensjonen PROP-obj ;
Vekten PROP-obj ;
Criminalloven PROP-obj ;
Stadnamn PROP-obj ;
Rettsvidenskap PROP-obj ;
Samlinger PROP-obj ;
Likestillingssenter PROP-obj ;
Eldor PROP-obj ;
Graphics PROP-obj ;
Genesis PROP-obj ;
Statens PROP-obj ;
Katekismus PROP-obj ;
Gujarat PROP-obj ;
Telnet PROP-obj ;
Universitet PROP-obj ;
Snøhvit PROP-obj ;
Report PROP-obj ;
Folkerett PROP-obj ;
Arkiv PROP-obj ;
Company PROP-obj ;
Josva PROP-mal ;
Vilfred PROP-mal ;
Arild PROP-mal ;
Hesiod PROP-mal ;
Njord PROP-mal ;
Tyge PROP-mal ;
Eldrimne PROP-mal ;
Klype PROP-mal ;
Fakse PROP-mal ;
Narve PROP-mal ;
Toralf PROP-mal ;
Petrof PROP-mal ;
Allah PROP-mal ;
Remi PROP-mal ;
Torsti PROP-mal ;
Malik PROP-mal ;
Sadok PROP-mal ;
Natanael PROP-mal ;
Miguel PROP-mal ;
Torkjell PROP-mal ;
Seram PROP-mal ;
Trym PROP-mal ;
Uttian PROP-mal ;
Ben PROP-mal ;
Steven PROP-mal ;
Joaquin PROP-mal ;
Håkon PROP-mal ;
Kolbjørn PROP-mal ;
Marco PROP-mal ;
Juho PROP-mal ;
Drillo PROP-mal ;
Roberto PROP-mal ;
Eldar PROP-mal ;
Einar PROP-mal ;
Anwar PROP-mal ;
Oliver PROP-mal ;
Astor PROP-mal ;
Æneas PROP-mal ;
Messias PROP-mal ;
Euripides PROP-mal ;
Mathis PROP-mal ;
Arkelaos PROP-mal ;
Levkippos PROP-mal ;
Sebedeus PROP-mal ;
Columbanus PROP-mal ;
Justus PROP-mal ;
Josát PROP-mal ;
Johnny PROP-mal ;
Jabin PROP-surmal ;
Pipin PROP-surmal ;
Germanicus PROP-surmal ;
Leviticus PROP-surmal ;
Lepidus PROP-surmal ;
Timeus PROP-surmal ;
Nereus PROP-surmal ;
Perseus PROP-surmal ;
Taipalus PROP-surmal ;
Camelus PROP-surmal ;
Androklus PROP-surmal ;
Onesimus PROP-surmal ;
Urbanus PROP-surmal ;
Marinus PROP-surmal ;
Martinus PROP-surmal ;
Arcturus PROP-surmal ;
Ephesus PROP-surmal ;
Tapajós PROP-surmal ;
Lemesós PROP-surmal ;
Enoš PROP-surmal ;
Feda PROP-fem ;
Skikda PROP-fem ;
Forda PROP-fem ;
Olea PROP-fem ;
Gretha PROP-fem ;
Lucia PROP-fem ;
Kaija PROP-fem ;
Ericka PROP-fem ;
Aila PROP-fem ;
Viola PROP-fem ;
Johana PROP-fem ;
Lina PROP-fem ;
Carina PROP-fem ;
Betina PROP-fem ;
Madonna PROP-fem ;
Vera PROP-fem ;
Aurora PROP-fem ;
Rosa PROP-fem ;
Brita PROP-fem ;
Åsta PROP-fem ;
Tanya PROP-fem ;
Malfrid PROP-fem ;
Turid PROP-fem ;
Arnhild PROP-fem ;
Ingegerd PROP-fem ;
Matilde PROP-fem ;
Renathe PROP-fem ;
Lucie PROP-fem ;
Annemarie PROP-fem ;
Aile PROP-fem ;
May-Lene PROP-fem ;
Helmine PROP-fem ;
Kirstine PROP-fem ;
Synne PROP-fem ;
Konstanse PROP-fem ;
Annette PROP-fem ;
Gunborg PROP-fem ;
Margith PROP-fem ;
Ragni PROP-fem ;
Kristi PROP-fem ;
Jill PROP-fem ;
Irmelin PROP-fem ;
Solrunn PROP-fem ;
Tamar PROP-fem ;
Herdis PROP-fem ;
Margot PROP-fem ;
Kelly PROP-fem ;
Conny PROP-fem ;
Inge PROP-malfem ;
Kari PROP-malfem ;
Robin PROP-malfem ;
Eira PROP-surfem ;
Vedenoja PROP-sur ;
Illukka PROP-sur ;
Rounala PROP-sur ;
Lampila PROP-sur ;
Loukola PROP-sur ;
Hiltula PROP-sur ;
Tuusa PROP-sur ;
Portaankorva PROP-sur ;
Rønnestad PROP-sur ;
Rolstad PROP-sur ;
Rørstad PROP-sur ;
Donald PROP-sur ;
Olavsgaard PROP-sur ;
Benneche PROP-sur ;
Capone PROP-sur ;
Nordskag PROP-sur ;
Skretting PROP-sur ;
Castberg PROP-sur ;
Gjengseth PROP-sur ;
Heinimäki PROP-sur ;
Nonni PROP-sur ;
Sassi PROP-sur ;
Lindvik PROP-sur ;
Fraenkel PROP-sur ;
Tim PROP-sur ;
Hallan PROP-sur ;
Myken PROP-sur ;
Kotanen PROP-sur ;
Vesainen PROP-sur ;
Prittinen PROP-sur ;
Selonen PROP-sur ;
Hatunen PROP-sur ;
Godtfredsen PROP-sur ;
Poulsen PROP-sur ;
Klemetsen PROP-sur ;
Bolin PROP-sur ;
Mattsson PROP-sur ;
Jokikokko PROP-sur ;
Tiitto PROP-sur ;
Gunther PROP-sur ;
Struer PROP-sur ;
Mannes PROP-sur ;
Aarhus PROP-sur ;
Adelhardt PROP-sur ;
Colett PROP-sur ;
Lexow PROP-sur ;
Pöllä PROP-sur ;
